Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5755.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 274. (1) The department shall issue directives requiring all state agencies to submit all legislative reports to the department. A state agency shall include in its initial submission to the department all legislative reports that were required during the 10-year period immediately preceding the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (2) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall develop and operate a website to publish the legislative reports that it receives under subsection (1). The website must meet both of the following requirements: (a) Be accessible to the public at no cost. (b) Be searchable. (3) As used in this section, "legislative report" means a report that a state agency is required by law to submit to the legislature.